Hawaii statutes.
§121-38 Wearing of uniform for private
purposes. Any member of the national guard or other component of the
militia wearing a uniform or any portion thereof issued by the United States or
the State, except for military purposes, without permission being first
obtained from an officer authorized to grant this permission by the governor,
is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punishable by a fine not exceeding
$25, or imprisonment for not more than thirty days. [L 1967, c 196, pt of §1;
HRS §121-38]

Cross References

Classification of
offense and authorized punishment, see §§701-107, 706-640, 663.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next